windows/es.aff
SFX z Y 216
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslo  [^fh]acer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosla  [^fh]acer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosle  [^fh]acer
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslos [^fh]acer
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslas [^fh]acer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosles [^fh]acer
SFX z   cer   gámonoslo   [fh]acer
SFX z   cer   gámonosla   [fh]acer
SFX z   cer   gámonosle   [fh]acer
SFX z   cer   gámonoslos  [fh]acer
SFX z   cer   gámonoslas  [fh]acer
SFX z   cer   gámonosles  [fh]acer
SFX z   er    gámonoslo   aler
SFX z   er    gámonosla   aler
SFX z   er    gámonosle   aler
SFX z   er    gámonoslos  aler
SFX z   er    gámonoslas  aler
SFX z   er    gámonosles  aler
SFX z   er    igámonoslo  aer
SFX z   er    igámonosla  aer
SFX z   er    igámonosle  aer
SFX z   er    igámonoslos aer
SFX z   er    igámonoslas aer
SFX z   er    igámonosles aer
SFX z   caber quepámonoslo caber
SFX z   caber quepámonosla caber
SFX z   caber quepámonosle caber
SFX z   caber quepámonoslos caber
SFX z   caber quepámonoslas caber
SFX z   caber quepámonosles caber
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslo  ecer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosla  ecer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosle  ecer
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslos ecer
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslas ecer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosles ecer
SFX z   er    igámonoslo  oer
SFX z   er    igámonosla  oer
SFX z   er    igámonosle  oer
SFX z   er    igámonoslos oer
SFX z   er    igámonoslas oer
SFX z   er    igámonosles oer
SFX z   er    yámonoslo   oer
SFX z   er    yámonosla   oer
SFX z   er    yámonosle   oer
SFX z   er    yámonoslos  oer
SFX z   er    yámonoslas  oer
SFX z   er    yámonosles  oer
SFX z   er    gámonoslo   [eo]ner
SFX z   er    gámonosla   [eo]ner
SFX z   er    gámonosle   [eo]ner
SFX z   er    gámonoslos  [eo]ner
SFX z   er    gámonoslas  [eo]ner
SFX z   er    gámonosles  [eo]ner
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslo  [^c]ocer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosla  [^c]ocer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosle  [^c]ocer
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslos [^c]ocer
SFX z   cer   zcámonoslas [^c]ocer
SFX z   cer   zcámonosles [^c]ocer
SFX z   aber  epámonoslo  saber
SFX z   aber  epámonosla  saber
SFX z   aber  epámonosle  saber
SFX z   aber  epámonoslos saber
SFX z   aber  epámonoslas saber
SFX z   aber  epámonosles saber
SFX z   ir    gámonoslo   alir
SFX z   ir    gámonosla   alir
SFX z   ir    gámonosle   alir
SFX z   ir    gámonoslos  alir
SFX z   ir    gámonoslas  alir
SFX z   ir    gámonosles  alir
SFX z   ebir  ibámonoslo  ebir
SFX z   ebir  ibámonosla  ebir
SFX z   ebir  ibámonosle  ebir
SFX z   ebir  ibámonoslos ebir
SFX z   ebir  ibámonoslas ebir
SFX z   ebir  ibámonosles ebir
SFX z   ecir  igámonoslo  ecir
SFX z   ecir  igámonosla  ecir
SFX z   ecir  igámonosle  ecir
SFX z   ecir  igámonoslos ecir
SFX z   ecir  igámonoslas ecir
SFX z   ecir  igámonosles ecir
SFX z   edir  idámonoslo  edir
SFX z   edir  idámonosla  edir
SFX z   edir  idámonosle  edir
SFX z   edir  idámonoslos edir
SFX z   edir  idámonoslas edir
SFX z   edir  idámonosles edir
SFX z   egir  ijámonoslo  egir
SFX z   egir  ijámonosla  egir
SFX z   egir  ijámonosle  egir
SFX z   egir  ijámonoslos egir
SFX z   egir  ijámonoslas egir
SFX z   egir  ijámonosles egir
SFX z   emir  imámonoslo  emir
SFX z   emir  imámonosla  emir
SFX z   emir  imámonosle  emir
SFX z   emir  imámonoslos emir
SFX z   emir  imámonoslas emir
SFX z   emir  imámonosles emir
SFX z   eír   iámosnolo   eír
SFX z   eír   iámonosla   eír
SFX z   eír   iámonosle   eír
SFX z   eír   iámonoslos  eír
SFX z   eír   iámonoslas  eír
SFX z   eír   iámonosles  eír
SFX z   eñir  iñámonoslo  eñir
SFX z   eñir  iñámonosla  eñir
SFX z   eñir  iñámonosle  eñir
SFX z   eñir  iñámonoslos eñir
SFX z   eñir  iñámonoslas eñir
SFX z   eñir  iñámonosles eñir
SFX z   eguir igámonoslo  eguir
SFX z   eguir igámonosla  eguir
SFX z   eguir igámonosle  eguir
SFX z   eguir igámonoslos eguir
SFX z   eguir igámonoslas eguir
SFX z   eguir igámonosles eguir
SFX z   enchir inchámonoslo enchir
SFX z   enchir inchámonosla enchir
SFX z   enchir inchámonosle enchir
SFX z   enchir inchámonoslos enchir
SFX z   enchir inchámonoslas enchir
SFX z   enchir inchámonosles enchir
SFX z   endir indámonoslo endir
SFX z   endir indámonosla endir
SFX z   endir indámonosle endir
SFX z   endir indámonoslos endir
SFX z   endir indámonoslas endir
SFX z   endir indámonosles endir
SFX z   enir  engámonoslo enir
SFX z   enir  engámonosla enir
SFX z   enir  engámonosle enir
SFX z   enir  engámonoslos enir
SFX z   enir  engámonoslas enir
SFX z   enir  engámonosles enir
SFX z   entir intámonoslo entir
SFX z   entir intámonosla entir
SFX z   entir intámonosle entir
SFX z   entir intámonoslos entir
SFX z   entir intámonoslas entir
SFX z   entir intámonosles entir
SFX z   erir  irámonoslo  erir
SFX z   erir  irámonosla  erir
SFX z   erir  irámonosle  erir
SFX z   erir  irámonoslos erir
SFX z   erir  irámonoslas erir
SFX z   erir  irámonosles erir
SFX z   ertir irtámonoslo ertir
SFX z   ertir irtámonosla ertir
SFX z   ertir irtámonosle ertir
SFX z   ertir irtámonoslos ertir
SFX z   ertir irtámonoslas ertir
SFX z   ertir irtámonosles ertir
SFX z   ervir irvámonoslo ervir
SFX z   ervir irvámonosla ervir
SFX z   ervir irvámonosle ervir
SFX z   ervir irvámonoslos ervir
SFX z   ervir irvámonoslas ervir
SFX z   ervir irvámonosles ervir
SFX z   estir istámonoslo estir
SFX z   estir istámonosla estir
SFX z   estir istámonosle estir
SFX z   estir istámonoslos estir
SFX z   estir istámonoslas estir
SFX z   estir istámonosles estir
SFX z   etir  itámonoslo  etir
SFX z   etir  itámonosla  etir
SFX z   etir  itámonosle  etir
SFX z   etir  itámonoslos etir
SFX z   etir  itámonoslas etir
SFX z   etir  itámonosles etir
SFX z   ír    igámonoslo  oír
SFX z   ír    igámonosla  oír
SFX z   ír    igámonosle  oír
SFX z   ír    igámonoslos oír
SFX z   ír    igámonoslas oír
SFX z   ír    igámonosles oír
SFX z   orir  urámonoslo  orir
SFX z   orir  urámonosla  orir
SFX z   orir  urámonosle  orir
SFX z   orir  urámonoslos orir
SFX z   orir  urámonoslas orir
SFX z   orir  urámonosles orir
SFX z   ormir urmámonoslo ormir
SFX z   ormir urmámonosla ormir
SFX z   ormir urmámonosle ormir
SFX z   ormir urmámonoslos ormir
SFX z   ormir urmámonoslas ormir
SFX z   ormir urmámonosles ormir
SFX z   cir   zcámonoslo  ucir
SFX z   cir   zcámonosla  ucir
SFX z   cir   zcámonosle  ucir
SFX z   cir   zcámonoslos ucir
SFX z   cir   zcámonoslas ucir
SFX z   cir   zcámonosles ucir
SFX z   ir    yámonoslo   [^g]uir
SFX z   ir    yámonosla   [^g]uir
SFX z   ir    yámonosle   [^g]uir
SFX z   ir    yámonoslos  [^g]uir
SFX z   ir    yámonoslas  [^g]uir
SFX z   ir    yámonosles  [^g]uir
SFX z   üir   uyámonoslo  güir
SFX z   üir   uyámonosla  güir
SFX z   üir   uyámonosle  güir
SFX z   üir   uyámonoslos güir
SFX z   üir   uyámonoslas güir
SFX z   üir   uyámonosles güir
SFX z   erguir irgámonoslo erguir
SFX z   erguir irgámonosla erguir
SFX z   erguir irgámonosle erguir
SFX z   erguir irgámonoslos erguir
SFX z   erguir irgámonoslas erguir
SFX z   erguir irgámonosles erguir

SFX S Y 11
SFX S   0     s           [aeiouáéó]
SFX S   0     es          [úídjlmry]
SFX S   z     ces         z
SFX S   0     es          [^é]s
SFX S   0     es          [^áéíóú]n
SFX S   án    anes        án
SFX S   én    enes        én
SFX S   ín    ines        ín
SFX S   ón    ones        ón
SFX S   ún    unes        ún
SFX S   és    eses        és
