windows/es.dic
óhmico/PS
abar/OPRSVWXr
abordar/OPQRSTVXrt
abulia/S
acastillado/PS
achantar/OPRSVWXr
acordónalo/BDPS
acuidad/S
adherir/OQWYZoqz
adjetívalo/BDPS
advertir/INOQWYZoqz
aeración/S
afollar/PSWX
agrávalo/BDPS
agradecer/IOQRTUWXoqz
agujadera/S
ajonjero/PS
albaceazgo/S
alcalescencia/S
alegrar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
algebrista/S
aljezar/S
alobrógico/PS
aludo/PS
amarrequear/PSVWX
amnistíalo/BDPS
amurcar/PSVWX
anconitano/PS
angina/S
ansotano/PS
antidroga/S
antropográfico/PS
aparar/PSVWX
aplacador/PS
aprieto/PS
arbitrista/S
ariscar/OPRSVWXr
arrastrar/ILOPQRSTVWXrt
artífice/S
aseglarar/OPRSVWXr
aspersorio/PS
ataviar/PSWX
atrásalo/BDPS
atribuir/OQWYZoqz
auriga/S
avívalo/BDPS
ayalés/PS
bárdalo/BDPS
badina/S
ballenero/PS
baraca/S
barquero/PS
bastonear/PSVWX
beleño/PS
besugo/S
binadura/S
blíndalo/BDPS
bodorrio/S
boquerón/S
botellín/S
bribonear/PSVWX
bufete/S
cálido/MPS
cúneo/S
cablegráfico/PS
cadenero/PS
calavernario/S
calmar/LNOPQRSTVWXrt
camote/PS
candil/S
caparazón/S
caramillo/PS
caricaturízalo/BDPS
carretonada/S
casiller/PS
catastrófico/MPS
cazuz/S
ceñir/OQWYZoqz
cenadero/PS
cercenar/IPQSTVWXt
chínchalo/BDPS
chapotear/PSVWX
chinesco/PS
chulear/OPQRSTVWXrt
cigoto/S
circunstanciar/PQSTVXt
clausular/PQSTVWXt
cobrable/S
cohíbelo/BDPS
collerón/S
cometedor/PS
componer/OQRTUWYoqz
compositivo/PS
concluir/OQWYZoqz
concolega/S
confiérelo/BDPS
conmuévelo/BPS
conseguir/IOQWYZoqz
consentir/IOQWYZoqz
constitucionalista/S
construir/OQWYZoqz
contrabraza/S
contrastar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
convertir/OQWYZoqz
copiar/LOPQRSTUVXrtu
cornalón/S
corregir/IOQWYZoqz
corso/PS
cotejo/PS
criminológico/PS
cuñete/S
cubito/S
cunero/PS
dísono/PS
decalitro/S
decir/OQWYZoqz
defensoría/S
demencia/S
depilar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
desabróchalo/BDPS
desalmidonar/PQSTVXt
desasociar/OPQRSTVXrt
descachárralo/BDPS
descoco/PS
descomponer/OQRTUWYoqz
descriptible/S
desempalágalo/BDPS
desengoznar/PSVWX
desfacer/OQRTUWYoqz
desfavorable/MS
deshacer/OQRTUWYoqz
deshollinar/PSVWX
desmán/PS
desnucar/OPQRSTVWXrt
despavonar/PSVX
desportilladura/S
destierro/PS
destruir/OQWYZoqz
desvolvedor/S
diaconar/PSVX
diente/S
dimorfismo/S
disconformidad/S
disminuir/OQWYZoqz
dispendioso/MPS
distribuir/OQWYZoqz
doñigal/S
don/S
drupa/S
echador/PS
eflorescencia/S
electroimán/S
elegir/OQWYZoqz
embaidor/PS
emborronar/OPQRSTVXrt
empacar/IOPRSVWXr
empingorotar/PSVWX
enardecedor/PS
encapsular/PQSTVWXt
encizañar/PSVWX
endecágono/PS
enfitéutico/PS
engrósalo/BDPS
enlazador/PS
enriqueño/PS
entalamar/PSVWX
entrelistado/PS
envegar/OPRSVXr
epirota/S
erosiónalo/BDPS
escalo/DPS
escatimar/PSVWX
escorpina/S
esférico/PS
espadín/S
esperanto/S
espontáneo/MPS
estórbalo/BDPS
establecer/IOQRTUWXoqz
estatuto/S
estirón/S
estrellamar/PSVWX
eternizar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
exécralo/BDPS
excluir/OQWYZoqz
exhórtalo/BDPS
expedir/HLOQWYZoqz
extrasensorial/S
familiar/MS
fatalista/S
ferroprusiato/S
flagelo/DPS
fortalécelo/DPS
frotadura/S
galeno/PS
gastronomía/S
glabro/PS
granel/S
guarnicionar/PQSTVXt
hacer/ILOQRTUWYoqz
hagiográfico/PS
hembraje/S
hidratar/HLPQSTVWXt
hisca/S
hormigante/S
hurto/PS
impaciente/MPS
impedir/LOQWYZoqz
imponer/OQRTUWYoqz
inastillable/S
incluir/OQWYZoqz
incuso/PS
infalibilidad/S
inmotivado/MPS
insurgencia/S
interponer/OQRTUWYoqz
intrascendente/S
introducir/OQRTUWXoqz
israelita/S
jeronimiano/PS
juvenil/S
lagrimoso/PS
lauredal/S
leteo/PS
linajista/S
localista/S
luxemburgués/PS
madrona/S
malleto/S
manipuleo/S
mantener/IOQRTUWXoqz
marimoña/S
matidez/S
medir/HOQWYZoqz
melanoma/S
merlín/S
microsegundo/S
misionar/PSVX
molondrón/S
morapio/S
muñequera/S
mustio/MPS
neólogo/PS
niño/PS
nublo/BDPS
obstruir/OQWYZoqz
obtener/OQRTUWXoqz
ocluir/OQWYZoqz
ocultar/HIOPQRSTUVWXrtu
ofrecer/IOQRTUWXoqz
operar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
ostensible/MS
pagar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
panderete/PS
parche/PS
parecer/OQRSTUWXoqz
patón/PS
pedir/OQWYZoqz
pedrea/S
perínclito/PS
perpetrar/HPQSTVWXt
perseguir/IOQWYZoqz
picarro/S
pirar/OPRSVWXr
plaquín/S
polemista/S
poner/ILOQRTUWYoqz
porrear/PSVWX
próstilo/S
predecir/OQWYZoqz
presagiar/PQSTVXt
proceso/PS
producir/OQRTUWXoqz
proponer/OQRTUWYoqz
proteccionista/S
pulsador/PS
quincalla/S
radiocomunicación/S
ratifícalo/BDPS
recatear/PSVWX
reconstruir/OQWYZoqz
redactor/PS
reducir/IOQRTUWXoqz
reelegir/OQWYZoqz
reexpedir/HOQWYZoqz
regatería/S
remandar/PSVX
repetir/HNOQWYZoqz
replicador/PS
respiro/PS
revívelo/BPS
roñar/PSVX
rosigo/PS
sísmico/PS
salchichón/S
sango/S
saxifragia/S
semicabrón/S
servil/MS
servir/OQWYZoqz
simplista/S
sobreentiéndelo/BDPS
solimitano/PS
soto/PS
suegro/PS
suspensorio/PS
sustituir/OQWYZoqz
taiga/S
taraje/S
telesilla/S
tener/LOQRTUWXoqz
termométrico/PS
timocrático/PS
tomadura/S
totoral/S
traer/OQWYZoqz
transferir/OQWYZoqz
transfronterizo/PS
trastada/S
tripón/PS
tunante/PS
urape/S
vampírico/PS
venero/PS
viértelo/BDPS
visco/S
washingtoniano/PS
zarapatel/S
